Hawaii statutes.
§383-36 Notice of determinations.
Notice of a determination or redetermination upon a claim shall be promptly
given to the claimant, by delivery thereof or by mailing the notice to the
claimant's last known address. In addition, notice of a determination or
redetermination with respect to the first week of a benefit year shall be given
to each employer by whom the claimant was employed during the claimant's base
period, and to the last employing unit by whom the claimant was employed, and
notice of any determination or redetermination which involves the application
of section 383-30 shall be given to the last employing unit by whom the
claimant was employed, in every case by delivery thereof to such party or by
mailing the notice to the party's last known address. [L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of
subs 18; RL 1945, §4237; am L 1953, c 22, §1(5); RL 1955, §93-35; HRS §383-36;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next